Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.050

Theft in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of theft in the third degree if he or she commits theft of property or services which (a) does not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars in value, or (b) includes ten or more merchandise pallets, or ten or more beverage crates, or a combination of ten or more merchandise pallets and beverage crates.

(2) Theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2009 c 431 s 9; 1998 c 236 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.050.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Civil action for shoplifting by adults, minors: RCW 4.24.230.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.